Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-924.01
Correctional Services Insurance Proceeds Fund; created; use; investment.

The Correctional Services Insurance Proceeds Fund is created. The fund shall consist of insurance claim proceeds received by the Department of Correctional Services. The fund shall be used for operating or capital costs incurred by the department. The fund shall be administered by the Director of Correctional Services or his or her designee. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Correctional Services Insurance Proceeds Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 120.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.